Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 29. Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority.
§ 33.2-2908.
Covenants to secure bonds.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds of the Authority may, for the benefit and security of the holders of such bonds, contain covenants by the Authority for such a purpose, including covenants as to, among other things:

The operation, maintenance, and repair of the Authority facilities;

The purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of such bonds may be applied and the use and disposition thereof;

The use and disposition of the revenues of the Authority derived from the ownership or operation of Authority facilities and additions, improvements, and extensions thereof, including the investment thereof and the creation and maintenance of reserve funds and funds for working capital and all renewals and replacements to Authority facilities;

The amount, if any, of additional revenue bonds payable from such revenues that may be issued and the terms and conditions on which such additional revenue bonds may be issued;

Fixing, maintaining, collection, and deposit of fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges for all the services sold, furnished, or supplied by the Authority facilities;

The operation, maintenance, repair, management, accounting, and auditing of the Authority;

Limitations upon the right of the Authority to dispose of Authority facilities or any part thereof without providing for the payment of the outstanding revenue bonds;

The appointment of trustees, depositaries, and paying agents within or without the Commonwealth to receive, hold, disburse, invest, or reinvest the proceeds derived from the sale of revenue bonds and all or any part of the revenues derived by the Authority from the operation, ownership, and management of the Authority facilities; and

Such other covenants and agreements as may be determined necessary in the discretion of the Authority to advantageously market the revenue bonds of the Authority.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7008; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2909.
Revenue bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and all insurance companies, trust companies, banks, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are also hereby made securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any Commonwealth or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is or may be authorized by law.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7009; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2910.
Authority obligations to be negotiable instruments; enforcement of bonds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, or any provision of law, any recital in any bond, any interim receipt, or any other obligation issued under the provisions of this chapter, all such bonds, interim receipts, or other obligations shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the Commonwealth. The provisions of this chapter, and of any resolution or indenture providing for the issuance and security of any revenue bonds, interim receipts, or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, shall constitute a contract with the holder of such revenue bonds, interim receipts, or other obligations, and the agreements and covenants of the Authority under this chapter and under such resolution, resolutions, or indentures shall be enforceable by any holder of revenue bonds, interim receipts, or other obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter and any representative of such holder, and any trustee appointed under the bond resolution and authorized to do so, may by suit, action, injunction, mandamus, or other proceeding issued by a court of competent jurisdiction enforce all rights of such holders under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted by this chapter and in any such bond resolution or indenture and may compel performance of all duties required to be performed by this chapter and by such bond resolutions or indenture by the Authority or by any officer or agent thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges for the use of the Authority facilities.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7010; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2911.
Exemption from taxation.

All property, real and personal, and all rights and interests therein and the income of the Authority, the revenue bonds and the interest thereon, and the transfer thereof and any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation or assessment by the Commonwealth and by any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7011; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2912.
General powers of City of Richmond and Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield.

The City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield may enter into and perform contracts or agreements with the Authority providing for furnishing to the Authority one or more of the following cooperative undertakings or any combination thereof:

The preparation, acquisition, loan, or exchange of survey, engineering, borings, construction and other technical reports, studies, plans, and data;

The providing of engineering, planning and other professional and technical services, labor, or other things of value;

The construction, in whole or in part, of public highways, bridges, tunnels, viaducts, interchanges, connecting highways, grade crossings, and other highway facilities;

The providing of funds in lump sums or installments to assist in paying the cost of any Authority facility or any Authority undertaking authorized by this chapter or the operation and maintenance thereof;

The acquisition and transfer to the Authority of land, including easements, rights-of-way, or other property, useful in the construction, operation, or maintenance of any Authority facility;

The making of payments or contributions to the Authority for the use of or in compensation for the services rendered by any Authority facility in lieu of the payment of tolls or other charges therefor, and such payments and contributions shall be deemed revenues of the project to the same extent as the tolls, rentals, fees, and other charges collected in the operation of the project;

When requested by the Authority, the vacating or changing of the location of any public highway or other public way or place or any portion thereof, public utility, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, or other equipment or appliance owned or controlled by or under the jurisdiction of either the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, in the manner required or authorized by law conferring such power on the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, and to construct the same in such new location as shall be designated by the governing body of the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, and the cost of vacating or changing the location or reconstruction thereof and any damages resulting therefrom required to be paid by the City of Richmond or County of Henrico or Chesterfield shall be reimbursed by the Authority as a part of the cost of the project in connection with which such expenditures have been made; and

The connection of any project of the Authority with the streets, highways, roads, and other public ways in the City of Richmond and in the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7012; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2913.
Powers of City of Richmond and Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield with respect to revenue bonds issued by the Authority.

The City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield each may enter into and perform contracts and agreements with the Authority to aid the Authority to pay the principal of and interest on revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds issued by the Authority if, when, and as the revenues of the Authority may not be sufficient to pay such principal or interest when due. No such contract or agreement shall be deemed to be lending or granting credit to or in aid of any person, association, company, or corporation within the meaning of Section 10 of Article X of the Constitution of Virginia, nor shall any such contract or agreement be deemed to be a pledge of the full faith and credit or of the taxing power of the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield for the payment of such principal or interest except as may be otherwise provided in such contracts or agreements. Any holder of bonds, notes, certificates, or other evidences of borrowing issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter or of coupons appertaining thereto, and the representatives of such holders and the trustee under any bond resolution or indenture, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce all rights of the Authority under or by virtue of any such contract or agreement.

Funds to perform any such contract or agreement may be provided by the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield by appropriations of general or specific tax revenue, or by appropriations of accumulated funds allocated for public improvements generally, or allocated to the purposes of such contract or agreement, or by appropriations of the proceeds from the sale of bonds, which may be issued as provided in this chapter.

The City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield may issue bonds for the purpose of providing funds to perform any contract or agreement entered into with the Authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Such bonds shall mature at such time not exceeding 40 years from their date, as may be determined by the governing body of the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield issuing such bonds, and may be redeemable before maturity, at the option of the governing body of the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield, at such price and under such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by such governing body prior to the issuance of the bonds. The City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, and the County of Chesterfield may provide for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any outstanding bond that has been issued pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon, and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds.

The authority of the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, and the County of Chesterfield to contract and to issue bonds pursuant to this chapter is in addition to any existing authority to contract and issue bonds, anything in the laws of the Commonwealth, including the Charter of the City of Richmond, to the contrary notwithstanding, all of which laws and Charter are hereby amended or modified so as to effectuate the powers conferred by this chapter.

The governing bodies of the City of Richmond and of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield may exercise any of the powers granted by this chapter by resolution, and all proceedings of the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield authorizing the execution of such contracts and providing for the issuance of bonds pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall not be subject to the provisions of the Charter of the City or this Code permitting a referendum on actions taken by the City Council and Boards of Supervisors except as required by the Constitution of Virginia, but all such proceedings shall take effect immediately upon the adoption thereof.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7013; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2914.
Powers of the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The Commonwealth Transportation Board may:

Enter into and perform contracts or agreements with the Authority to furnish it with surveys, engineering, borings, plans, and specifications and other technical services, reports, studies, and data, the cost of which shall be reimbursed by the Authority as a part of the cost of the project in connection with which such contracts or agreements were entered into;

Allocate to and for the construction, operation, or maintenance of any highways constructed by the Authority and pay to the Authority such funds as may be or become available to the Commonwealth Transportation Board for such purposes;

Permit the connection of any highways constructed or acquired by the Authority with highways under the control and jurisdiction of the Commonwealth Transportation Board; and

Employ independent consulting engineers having a nationwide and favorable repute in estimating traffic over any such highways to determine whether the construction of such highways will result in substantial reduction in the volume of traffic over Interstate 95 and use funds under the control of the Commonwealth Transportation Board for that purpose.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7014; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2915.
Acquisition of property.

The Authority may acquire, solely from funds provided under the provisions of this chapter, such lands, structures, properties, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights, as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction and operation of Authority facilities, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof.

The City of Richmond, the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, the Commonwealth Transportation Board, and, with the approval of the Governor, public agencies and commissions of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, may lease, lend, grant, or convey to the Authority at its request upon such terms and conditions as the governing bodies of the City of Richmond, the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, the Commonwealth Transportation Board, or the proper authorities of such agencies or commissions of the Commonwealth may deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity of any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality, other than the regular and formal action of the governing bodies or authorities concerned, any real property that may be necessary or convenient for the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the Authority, including public highways and any other real property already devoted to public use.

The City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield may, subject to the provisions of §

25.1-102

, acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain granted to or conferred upon them, and in accordance with the procedure prescribed therefor, any real property that may be necessary or convenient for the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the Authority and lease, lend, grant, or convey such property to the Authority upon such terms and conditions as the governing bodies of the City of Richmond or Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield may deem reasonable and fair; the acquisition of such real property by the exercise of the power of eminent domain and the disposition of the same to the Authority as provided in this section shall be and is declared to be for a public use of such property.

In any eminent domain proceedings by the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield under this chapter, the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceeding may make such orders as may be just to the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield and to the owners of the property to be condemned, and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage by reason of the failure of the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield to accept and pay for the property, or by reason of the taking of property occupied by such owners, but neither such undertaking or security nor any act or obligation of the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield shall impose any liability upon the Commonwealth.

If the owner, lessee, or occupier of any property to be condemned or otherwise acquired pursuant to this chapter refuses to remove his property therefrom or give up possession thereof, the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield may proceed to obtain possession in any manner provided by law.

When the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield proposes to construct a highway across the tracks of any railroad, the exercise of the general power of eminent domain over the property of a railroad granted by §

33.2-2902

shall be limited with respect to the property, right-of-way, facilities, works, or appurtenances upon which the tracks at such proposed crossing are located, to the acquisition only of an easement therein, which crossing shall be constructed either sufficiently above or below the grade of any such railroad track so that neither the crossing then under construction nor any part thereof, including any bridge abutments, columns, supporting structures, and appurtenances, nor any traffic upon it shall interfere in any manner with the use, operation, or maintenance of the trains, tracks, works, or appurtenances of the railroad or interfere with or endanger the movement of the trains or traffic upon the tracks of the railroad. Prior to the exercise of the power of eminent domain for such an easement, plans and specifications of that portion of the project to be constructed across the railroad tracks showing compliance with such requirements and showing sufficient and safe plans and specifications for such overhead or underground structure and appurtenances shall be submitted to the railroad for examination and approval. If the railroad fails or refuses within 30 days to approve the plans and specifications so submitted, the matter shall be submitted by the Authority, the City of Richmond, or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield to the State Corporation Commission, whose decision, arrived at after due consideration in accordance with its usual procedure, shall be final as to the sufficiency and safety of such plans and specifications and as to such elevations or distances above or below such tracks. The overhead or underground structures and appurtenances shall be constructed in accordance with such plans and specifications and in accordance with such elevations or distances above or below such tracks so approved by the railroad or the State Corporation Commission. A copy of the plans and specifications approved by the railroad or the State Corporation Commission shall be filed as an exhibit upon the institution of any proceeding brought in the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

The Commonwealth hereby consents, subject to the approval of the Governor, to the use by the Authority of any other lands or property owned by the Commonwealth, including lands lying under water, that are deemed by the Authority to be necessary for the construction or operation of any project being constructed by the Authority.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7015; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 inserted “the” following “eminent domain and the disposition of” in subsection C.

§ 33.2-2916.
Transfer to City of Richmond.

If the City of Richmond has rendered financial assistance or contributed in any manner to the cost of construction of a limited access highway by the Authority within or partly within and partly without the corporate limits of the City of Richmond, and the Authority has issued bonds for the construction of such limited access highway, then, when all such bonds, including refunding bonds, and the interest thereon have been paid or a sufficient amount of cash or United States government securities have been deposited and dedicated to the payment of all such bonds and the interest to the maturity or redemption date thereof in trust for the benefit of the holders of such bonds, all property, real and personal, acquired in connection with such limited access highway within the City of Richmond shall be transferred by the Authority to the City as compensation to the City for the financial assistance rendered by the City to the Authority in connection with the construction or acquisition of such limited access highway. Such highway shall upon the acceptance thereof by the City become a part of the street or highway system of the City and shall thereafter be maintained and operated as a limited access highway by the City. The governing body of the City of Richmond shall have the power to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for transit over such limited access highway and as compensation for other uses that may be made thereof. The proceeds from such tolls and compensation shall be first used to reimburse the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield for any funds or expenditures made by each of them pursuant to contracts or agreements authorized by §

33.2-2913

for which reimbursement has not been made, and then for the operation, maintenance, improvement, expansion, or extension of such limited access highway and to increase its utility and benefits and for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and operation of other projects or highways connected with such limited access highway or with the federal or state highway systems, and for such purpose the City of Richmond shall succeed to all the functions and shall have all the powers conferred on the Authority by this chapter.

If the Authority constructs a limited access highway project partly within and partly without the corporate limits of the City of Richmond, any extension thereof shall be constructed or acquired only when approved by the unanimous vote of all members of the board of directors or by a vote of three-fourths of the directors and approval by the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield. If the Authority has issued bonds for the purpose of constructing such project or for the purpose of constructing or acquiring such extensions when all such bonds, including any refunding bonds, and the interest thereon have been paid or a sufficient amount of cash or United States government securities have been deposited and dedicated to the payment thereof in trust for the benefit of holders of such bonds, all property, real and personal, acquired in connection with such project or extension thereof not required to be transferred to the City of Richmond pursuant to subsection A shall be transferred by the Authority to the political subdivisions in which such property is located at the time of such transfer at no cost to such political subdivisions in the event the subdivisions adopt a resolution accepting such property. If not accepted by such subdivisions within 30 days from the offer of the property by the Authority, then the Authority shall transfer such property to the Commonwealth Transportation Board. If such property is accepted by the political subdivision where the property is located, the governing body of such subdivision shall have the power to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for transit over such limited access highway project or extension and as compensation for other uses that may be made thereof. The proceeds from such tolls and compensation shall be used first to reimburse the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield for any funds or expenditures made by each of them pursuant to contracts or agreements authorized by §

33.2-2913

for which reimbursement has not been made and then for the operation, maintenance, improvement, expansion, or extension of such limited access highway project and to increase its utility and benefits and for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and operation of other projects or highways connected with such limited access highway or with the state or federal highway systems and for such purpose such political subdivisions shall succeed to all the functions and shall have all the powers conferred on the Authority by this chapter with respect to such property.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7016; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256, in subsection A, divided the first sentence into two sentences by deleting “and” following “acquisition of such limited access highway.”

§ 33.2-2917.
Miscellaneous.

Any money set aside for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds issued by the Authority not claimed within two years from the day the principal of such bonds is due by maturity or by call for redemption shall be paid into the state treasury. No interest shall accrue on such principal or interest from the day the same is due. The Comptroller shall keep an account of all money thus paid into the state treasury, and it shall be paid to the individual partnership, association, or corporation entitled thereto upon satisfactory proof that such individual, partnership, association, or corporation is so entitled to such money. If the claim so presented is rejected by the Comptroller, the claimant may proceed against the Comptroller for recovery in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond. An appeal from the judgment of the circuit court shall lie to the Court of Appeals as in actions at law, and all laws and rules relating to practice and procedure in actions at law shall apply to such authorized proceedings. No such proceedings shall be filed after 10 years from the day the principal of or interest on such bonds is due; however, if the individual having such claim is an infant or insane person or is imprisoned at such due date, such proceedings may be filed within five years after the removal of such disability, notwithstanding the fact that such 10-year period has expired.

The Authority may contract with the City of Richmond, the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, and the Department of State Police for the policing of any Authority facilities, and the City of Richmond, the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, and the Department of State Police are hereby authorized to enter into contracts with the Authority for such purpose. Police officers providing police services pursuant to such contracts shall be under the exclusive control and direction of the authority providing such officers and shall be responsible to that authority exclusively for the performance of their duties and the exercise of their powers. The Authority shall reimburse the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, or the Commonwealth in such amounts and at such time as shall be mutually agreed upon for providing police service. Such officers shall be responsible for the preservation of the public peace, prevention of crime, apprehension of criminals, protection of the rights of persons and property, and enforcement of the laws of the Commonwealth and all regulations of the Authority made in accordance, and such officers shall have all the rights and duties of police officers as provided by the general laws of the Commonwealth. The violation of any such regulation shall be punishable as follows: if such a violation would have been a violation of law if committed on any public highway in the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, it shall be punishable in the same manner as if it had been committed on such public highway; otherwise it shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor. All other police officers of the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the areas of operations agreed upon by the parties that they have beyond such limits and shall have access to all such areas at any time without interference for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction. For the purpose of enforcing such laws and regulations, the court having jurisdiction for the trial of criminal offenses committed in the City of Richmond or in the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield within whose boundaries any crime is committed shall have jurisdiction to try any person charged with the violation of any such laws and regulations within such boundaries. A copy of the regulations of the Authority, attested by the secretary or secretary-treasurer of the Authority, may be admitted as evidence in lieu of the original. Any such copy purporting to be sealed and signed by such secretary or secretary-treasurer may be admitted as evidence without any proof of the seal or signature or of the official character of the person whose name is signed to it.

All actions at law and suits in equity and other proceedings, actions, and suits against the Authority, or any other person, firm, or corporation, growing out of the construction, maintenance, repair, operation, and use of any Authority facility, or growing out of any other circumstances, events, or causes in connection therewith, unless otherwise provided in this section, shall be brought and conducted in the court having jurisdiction of such actions, suits, and proceedings in the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield within whose boundaries the causes of such actions, suits, and proceedings arise, and jurisdiction is hereby conferred on such court for that purpose. All such actions, suits, and proceedings on behalf of the Authority shall be brought and conducted in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, except as otherwise provided in this section, and exclusive jurisdiction is hereby conferred on such court for the purpose. Eminent domain proceedings instituted and conducted by the Authority shall be brought and conducted in the court having jurisdiction of such proceedings in the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield within whose boundaries the land or other property to be so acquired or the major portion thereof is situated, and jurisdiction is hereby conferred on such court for such purpose.

On or before September 30 of each year, the Authority shall prepare a report of its activities for the 12-month period ending the preceding July 1 of such year and shall file a copy thereof with the Commonwealth Transportation Board, the City of Richmond, and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield. Each such report shall set forth an operating and financial statement covering the Authority’s operations during the 12-month period covered by the report. The Authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants to be selected by the Authority, and the cost of such audit shall be treated as a part of the cost of construction and operation of a project.

The records, books, and accounts of the Authority shall be subject to examination and inspection by duly authorized representatives of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, the governing bodies of the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, and any bondholder at any reasonable time, provided the business of the Authority is not unduly interrupted or interfered with thereby.

Any member, agent, or employee of the Authority who contracts with the Authority or is interested in contracting with the Authority or in the sale of any property, either real or personal, to the Authority shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 or imprisonment in jail for not more than one year, either or both. Exclusive jurisdiction for the trial of such misdemeanors is hereby conferred upon the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, provided that the term “contract,” as used in this chapter, shall not be held to include the depositing of funds in, the borrowing of funds from, or the serving as agent or trustee by any bank in which any member, agent, or employee of the Authority may be a director, officer, or employee or have a security interest, nor shall such term include contracts or agreements with the Commonwealth Transportation Board or the purchase of services from, or other transactions in the ordinary course of business with, public service corporations.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7017; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia” in subsection A.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 33.2-2918.
Approval by Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The Authority shall not construct a limited access toll highway without the approval of the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7018; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2919.
Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes hereof, and the foregoing sections of this chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method of doing the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred upon the City of Richmond by its Charter and upon the City of Richmond and Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield by other provisions of law; however, the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds, and except as provided in this chapter none of the powers granted to the Authority under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the supervision or regulation or require the approval or consent of the City of Richmond or the Counties of Henrico or Chesterfield or any commission, board, bureau, official, or agency thereof or of the Commonwealth, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7019; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2920.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

33.2-2920

, pertaining to severability, derived from 2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7020; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2921.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

All other laws, including the provisions of the Charter of the City of Richmond, inconsistent with any provision of this chapter are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this chapter and to any project constructed by the Authority pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7021; 2014, c. 805.